Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Alaska Gasline Inducement Act License.

Sec. 43.90.100.
Gas project.

The commissioners may award an Alaska Gasline Inducement Act license as provided in this chapter. The person awarded a license under this chapter is entitled to the inducement set out in AS

43.90.110

.

Nothing in this chapter precludes a person from pursuing a gas pipeline independently from this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.110.
Natural gas pipeline project construction inducement.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, a license issued under this chapter entitles the licensee or its designated affiliate to receive

subject to appropriation, state matching contributions in the form of reimbursements in a total amount not to exceed $500,000,000, paid to the licensee during the seven-year period immediately following the date the license is awarded; the payment period may be extended by the commissioners under an amendment or modification of the project plan under AS

43.90.210

; a payment under this paragraph shall be made according to the following:

on or before the close of the first binding open season, the state shall reimburse the licensee’s qualified expenditures at the level specified in the license; however, the state’s reimbursements may not exceed 50 percent of the qualified expenditures incurred before the close of the first binding open season;

after the close of the first binding open season, the state shall reimburse the licensee’s qualified expenditures at the level specified in the license; however, the state’s reimbursements may not exceed 90 percent of the qualified expenditures incurred after the close of the first binding open season;

a qualified expenditure is a cost that is incurred after the license is issued under this chapter by the licensee or the licensee’s designated affiliate, and is directly and reasonably related to pursuing firm transportation commitments in a binding open season, to securing financing for the project, or to obtaining a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, as appropriate, or satisfying a requirement of an agency with jurisdiction over the project; in this subparagraph, “qualified expenditures” does not include overhead costs, lobbying costs, litigation costs, the cost of an asset or work product acquired or developed by the licensee before the license is issued, or civil or criminal penalties or fines; and

the benefit of an Alaska Gasline Inducement Act coordinator who has the authority prescribed in AS

43.90.250

.

The commissioner of revenue in consultation with the commissioner of natural resources shall adopt regulations for determining whether an expenditure is a qualified expenditure for the purposes of (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska gasline inducement act reimbursement, see 15 AAC 90, art. 1.

Sec. 43.90.120.
Request for applications for the license.

The commissioners shall commence a public process to request applications for a license under this chapter as soon as practicable after June 8, 2007.

The commissioners may use independent contractors to assist them in developing the request for applications and in evaluating applications received under this chapter.

The provisions of AS 36.30 do not apply to requests for applications under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.130.
Application requirements.

An application for a license must be consistent with the terms of the request for applications under AS

43.90.120

and must

be filed by the deadline established by the commissioners in the request for applications;

provide a thorough description of a proposed natural gas pipeline project for transporting natural gas from the North Slope to market, which description may include multiple design proposals, including different design proposals for pipe diameter, wall thickness, and transportation capacity, and which description must include

the route proposed for the natural gas pipeline, which may not be the route described in AS

38.35.017(b)

;

the location of receipt and delivery points and the size and design capacity of the proposed natural gas pipeline at the proposed receipt and delivery points, except that this information is not required for in-state delivery points unless the application proposes specific in-state delivery points;

an analysis of the project’s economic and technical viability, including a description of all pipeline access and tariff terms the applicant plans to offer;

an economically and technically viable work plan, timeline, and associated budget for developing and performing the proposed project, including field work, environmental studies, design, and engineering, implementing practices for controlling carbon emissions from natural gas systems as established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and complying with all applicable state, federal, and international regulatory requirements that affect the proposed project; the applicant shall address the following:

if the proposed project involves a pipeline into or through Canada, a thorough description of the applicant’s plan to obtain necessary rights-of-way and authorizations in Canada, a description of the transportation services to be provided and a description of rate-making methodologies the applicant will propose to the regulatory agencies, and an estimate of rates and charges for all services;

if the proposed project involves marine transportation of liquefied natural gas, a description of the marine transportation services to be provided and a description of proposed rate-making methodologies; an estimate of rates and charges for all services by third parties; a detailed description of all proposed access and tariff terms for liquefaction services or, if third parties would perform liquefaction services, identification of the third parties and the terms applicable to the liquefaction services; a complete description of the marine segment of the project, including the proposed ownership, control, and cost of liquefied natural gas tankers, the management of shipping services, liquefied natural gas export, destination, regasification facilities, and pipeline facilities needed for transport to market destinations, and the entity or entities that would be required to obtain necessary export permits and licenses or a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for the transportation of liquefied natural gas in interstate commerce if United States markets are proposed; and all rights-of-way or authorizations required from a foreign country;

commit that if the proposed project is within the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the applicant will

conclude, by a date certain that is not later than 36 months after the date the license is issued, a binding open season that is consistent with the requirements of 18 C.F.R. Part 157, Subpart B (Open Seasons for Alaska Natural Gas Transportation Projects) and 18 C.F.R. 157.30 — 157.39;

apply for Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approval to use the prefiling procedures set out in 18 C.F.R. 157.21 by a date certain, and use those procedures before filing an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, except where the procedures are not required as a result of sec. 5 of the President’s Decision issued under 15 U.S.C. 719 et seq. (Alaska Natural Gas Transportation Act of 1976); and

apply for a Federal Energy Regulatory Commission certificate of public convenience and necessity to authorize the construction and operation of the proposed project described in this section by a date certain;

if the proposed project is within the jurisdiction of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, commit to

conclude, by a date certain that is not later than 36 months after the date the license is issued, a binding open season that is consistent with the requirements of AS 42.06; and

apply for a certificate of public convenience and necessity to authorize the construction and operation of the proposed project by a date certain;

commit that after the first binding open season, the applicant will assess the market demand for additional pipeline capacity at least every two years through public nonbinding solicitations or similar means;

commit to expand the proposed project in reasonable engineering increments and on commercially reasonable terms that encourage exploration and development of gas resources in this state; in this paragraph,

“commercially reasonable terms” means that, subject to the provisions of (7) of this section, revenue from transportation contracts covers the cost of the expansion, including increased fuel costs and a reasonable return on capital as authorized by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, as applicable, and there is no impairment of the proposed project’s ability to recover the costs of existing facilities;

“reasonable engineering increments” means the amount of additional capacity that could be added by compression or a pipe addition using a compressor size or pipe size, as applicable, that is substantially similar to the original compressor size and pipe size;

commit that the applicant

will propose and support the recovery of mainline capacity expansion costs, including fuel costs, from all mainline system users through rolled-in rates as provided in (B) and (C) of this paragraph or through a combination of incremental and rolled-in rates as provided in (D) of this paragraph;

will propose and support the recovery of mainline capacity expansion costs, including fuel costs, from all mainline system users through rolled-in rates; an applicant is obligated under this subparagraph only if the rolled-in rates would increase the rates

not described in (ii) of this subparagraph by not more than 15 percent above the initial maximum recourse rates for capacity acquired before commercial operations commence; in this sub-subparagraph, “initial maximum recourse rates” means the highest cost-based rates for any specific transportation service set by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, or the National Energy Board of Canada, as appropriate, when the pipeline commences commercial operations;

by not more than 15 percent above the negotiated rate for pipeline capacity on the date of commencement of commercial operations where the holder of the capacity is not an affiliate of the owner of the pipeline project; for the purposes of this sub-subparagraph, “negotiated rate” means the rate in a transportation service agreement that provides for a rate that varies from the otherwise applicable cost-based rate, or recourse rate, set out in a gas pipeline’s tariff approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, or the National Energy Board of Canada, as appropriate; or

for capacity acquired in an expansion after commercial operations commence, to a level that is not more than 115 percent of the volume-weighted average of all rates collected by the project owner for pipeline capacity on the date commercial operations commence;

will, if recovery of mainline capacity expansion costs, including fuel costs, through rolled-in rate treatment would increase the rates for capacity described in (B) of this paragraph, propose and support the partial roll-in of mainline expansion costs, including fuel costs, to the extent that rates acquired before commercial operations commence do not exceed the levels described in (B) of this paragraph;

may, for the recovery of mainline capacity expansion costs, including fuel costs, that, under rolled-in rate treatment, would result in rates that exceed the level in (B) of this paragraph, propose and support the recovery of those costs through any combination of incremental and rolled-in rates;

will not enter into a negotiated rate agreement that would preclude the applicant from collecting from any shipper, including a shipper with a negotiated rate agreement, the rolled-in rates that are required to be proposed and supported by the applicant under (B) of this paragraph or the partial rolled-in rates that are required to be proposed and supported by the applicant under (C) of this paragraph;

state how the applicant proposes to deal with a North Slope gas treatment plant, regardless of whether that plant is part of the applicant’s proposal, and, to the extent that the plant will be owned entirely or in part by the applicant, commit to seek certificate authority from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission if the proposed project is engaged in interstate commerce, or from the Regulatory Commission of Alaska if the project is not engaged in interstate commerce; for a North Slope gas treatment plant that will be owned entirely or in part by the applicant, for rate-making purposes, commit to value previously used assets that are part of the gas treatment plant at net book value; describe the gas treatment plant, including its design, engineering, construction, ownership, and plan of operation; the identity of any third party that will participate in the ownership or operation of the gas treatment plant; and the means by which the applicant will work to minimize the effect of the costs of the facility on the tariff;

propose a percentage and total dollar amount for the state’s reimbursement under AS

43.90.110(a)(1)(A)

and (B) to be specified in the license;

commit to propose and support rates for the proposed project and for any North Slope gas treatment plant that the applicant may own, in whole or in part, that are based on a capital structure for rate-making that consists of not less than 70 percent debt;

describe the means for preventing and managing overruns in costs of the proposed project, and the measures for minimizing the effects on tariffs from any overruns;

commit to provide a minimum of five delivery points of natural gas in this state;

commit to

offer firm transportation service to delivery points in this state as part of the tariff regardless of whether any shippers bid successfully in a binding open season for firm transportation service to delivery points in this state; and

offer distance-sensitive rates to delivery points in the state consistent with 18 C.F.R. 157.34(c)(8);

commit to establish a local headquarters in this state for the proposed project;

to the maximum extent permitted by law, commit to

hire qualified residents from throughout the state for management, engineering, construction, operations, maintenance, and other positions on the proposed project;

contract with businesses located in the state;

establish hiring facilities or use existing hiring facilities in the state; and

use, as far as is practicable, the job centers and associated services operated by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development and an Internet-based labor exchange system operated by the state;

waive the right to appeal the rejection of the application as incomplete, the issuance of a license to another applicant, or the determination under AS

43.90.180(b)

that no application merits the issuance of a license;

commit to negotiate, before construction, a project labor agreement to the maximum extent permitted by law; in this paragraph, “project labor agreement” means a comprehensive collective bargaining agreement between the licensee or its agent and the appropriate labor representatives to ensure expedited construction with labor stability for the project by qualified residents of the state;

commit that the state reimbursement received by a licensee may not be included in the applicant’s rate base, and shall be used as a credit against the licensee’s cost of service;

provide a detailed description of the applicant, all entities participating with the applicant in the application and the project proposed by the applicant, and persons the applicant intends to involve in the construction and operation of the proposed project; the description must include the nature of the affiliation for each person, the commitments by the person to the applicant, and other information relevant to the commissioners’ evaluation of the readiness and ability of the applicant to complete the project presented in the application;

demonstrate the readiness, financial resources, and technical ability to perform the activities specified in the application by describing the applicant’s history of compliance with safety, health, and environmental requirements, the ability to follow a detailed work plan and timeline, and the ability to operate within an associated budget.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.140.
Initial application review; additional information requests; complete applications.

After the deadline established by the commissioners for filing an application has passed, the commissioners shall open and review each application to determine whether it is consistent with the terms of the request for applications and meets the requirements of AS

43.90.130

. The commissioners shall reject as incomplete an application that does not meet the requirements of AS

43.90.130

.

To evaluate whether an application should be rejected under (a) of this section, the commissioners may request additional information relating to the application.

If, within the time specified by the commissioners, the applicant fails to provide the additional information requested under (b) of this section, or submits additional information that is not responsive, the application shall be rejected.

For an application not rejected under this section, the commissioners shall make a determination that the application, including any requested additional information, is complete.

Except as provided under AS

43.90.150

, and after determining which applications are complete, the commissioners shall make all applications available to the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.150.
Proprietary information and trade secrets.

At the request of the applicant, information submitted under this chapter that the applicant identifies and demonstrates is proprietary or is a trade secret is confidential and not subject to public disclosure under AS 40.25. After a license is awarded, all information submitted by the licensee, retained under this chapter, and not determined by the commissioners to be a proprietary or trade secret shall be made public.

If the commissioners determine that the information submitted by the applicant is not proprietary or is not a trade secret, the commissioners shall notify the applicant and return the information at the request of the applicant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.160.
Notice, review, and comment.

The commissioners shall publish notice and provide a 60-day period for public review and comment on all applications determined complete under AS

43.90.140

. Except as provided under AS

43.90.150

, all applications filed under this chapter shall be made public, including applications rejected as incomplete under AS

43.90.140

.

Applications received under this chapter are not subject to public disclosure under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

until the commissioners publish notice under this section. However, information that the commissioners have determined is proprietary or a trade secret under AS

43.90.150

may not be made public even after the notice is published under (a) of this section, except as otherwise provided in AS

43.90.150

. If information is proprietary or a trade secret and is held confidential under AS 43.90.150, the applicant shall provide a summary of the confidential information that is satisfactory to the commissioners, and the commissioners shall make the summary of the information available to the public.

After the commissioners determine that the applications are complete under AS

43.90.140

, information provided by an applicant to the commissioners under this chapter, including information determined by the commissioners to be confidential under AS

43.90.150

, shall be disclosed to the legislative auditor, the fiscal analyst who serves as head of the legislative finance division, members of the legislature, and their respective agents and contractors, on request and after the individual making the request signs a confidentiality agreement prepared by the commissioners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007; am § 33 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Sec. 43.90.170.
Application evaluation and ranking.

The commissioners shall evaluate all applications determined to be complete under AS

43.90.140

, consider public comments received under AS

43.90.160(a)

, and rank each application according to the net present value of the anticipated cash flow to the state from the applicant’s project proposal using the factors in (b) of this section and weighted by the project’s likelihood of success based on the commissioners’ assessment of the factors listed in (c) of this section.

When evaluating the net present value of anticipated cash flow to the state from the applicant’s project proposal, the commissioners shall use an undiscounted value and, at a minimum, discount rates of two, five, six, and eight percent, and consider

how quickly the applicant proposes to begin construction of the proposed project and how quickly the project will commence commercial operation;

the net back value of the gas determined by the destination market value of the gas and estimated transportation and treatment costs;

the ability of the applicant to prevent or reduce project cost overruns that would increase the tariff;

the initial design capacity of the applicant’s project and the extent to which the design can accommodate low-cost expansion;

the amount of the reimbursement by the state under AS

43.90.110(a)(1)(A)

and (B) proposed by the applicant under AS

43.90.130

(9);

economic value resulting from payments required to be made to the state under the terms of the proposal; and

other factors found by the commissioners to be relevant to the evaluation of the net present value of the anticipated cash flow to the state.

When evaluating the project’s likelihood of success, the commissioners shall consider

the reasonableness, specificity, and feasibility of the applicant’s work plan, timeline, and budget required to be submitted under AS

43.90.130

, including the applicant’s plan to manage cost overruns, insulate shippers from the effect of cost overruns, and encourage shippers to participate in the first binding open season;

the financial resources of the applicant;

the ability of the applicant to comply with the proposed performance schedule;

the applicant’s organization, experience, accounting and operational controls, technical skills or the ability to obtain them, and necessary equipment or the ability to obtain the necessary equipment;

the applicant’s record of

performance on projects not licensed under this chapter;

integrity and good business ethics; and

other evidence and factors found by the commissioners to be relevant to the evaluation of the project’s likelihood of success.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.180.
Notice to the legislature of intent to issue license; denial of license.

If, after consideration of public comments received under AS

43.90.160(a)

and evaluation of complete applications under AS

43.90.170

, the commissioners determine that an application proposes a project that will sufficiently maximize the benefits to the people of this state and merits issuance of a license under this chapter, the commissioners shall

issue a determination, with written findings addressing the basis for the determination; the determination becomes a final agency action on the effective date of a bill approving the issuance of the license under AS

43.90.190

;

publish notice of intent to issue a license under this chapter with written findings addressing the basis for the determination; and

forward the notice under (2) of this subsection, along with the findings, supporting documentation, and determination under (1) of this subsection, to the presiding officer of each house of the legislature for action as provided in AS

43.90.190

.

If, after evaluation of complete applications under AS

43.90.170

, the commissioners determine that no application sufficiently maximizes the benefits to the people of this state and merits issuance of a license under this chapter, the commissioners shall issue a written finding that addresses the basis for that determination.

The commissioners’ determination under (b) of this section is a final agency action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.190.
Legislative approval; issuance of license.

After the presiding officer of each house of the legislature receives a determination from the commissioners under AS

43.90.180

, the rules committee of each house of the legislature shall introduce a bill in the committee’s respective chamber that provides for the approval of the license proposed to be issued by the commissioners.

If a bill approving the issuance of the license passes the legislature within 60 days after the last date a presiding officer receives a determination by the commissioners under AS

43.90.180

, the commissioners shall issue the license as soon as practicable after the effective date of the Act approving the issuance of the license.

Notwithstanding a legislative rule that prohibits the carryover of a bill after the end of a special session or after the end of a regular session of a legislature, a bill introduced under (a) of this section that is not passed or not withdrawn, defeated, vetoed, or indefinitely postponed shall be carried over to any subsequent regular or special legislative session convened during the 60-day period described in (b) of this section in the same reading or status it was in at the time of adjournment. However, a bill introduced under (a) of this section may not be carried over to the first regular session of a legislature.

If the legislature fails to approve the issuance of the license, the commissioners

may not issue the license that the legislature failed to approve; and

may request new applications for a license under AS

43.90.120

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For the Act approving issuance of a license under this section, see
ch. 1, 4SSLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.
For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 1, 4SSLA 2008 (HB 3001) recommending approval of that license, see 2008 House Journal 3064 — 3068.

Sec. 43.90.200.
Certification by regulatory authority and project sanction.

A licensee that is awarded a certificate of public convenience and necessity from a regulatory agency with jurisdiction over the project shall accept the certificate on or before the date the order granting the certificate is no longer subject to judicial review.

If the licensee has credit support sufficient to finance construction of the project through ownership of rights to produce and market gas resources, firm transportation commitments, or government financing, the licensee shall sanction the project within one year after the effective date of the certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the regulatory agency with jurisdiction over the project.

If the licensee does not have credit support sufficient to finance construction of the project through ownership of rights to produce and market gas resources, firm transportation commitments, or government financing, the licensee shall sanction the project before the later of

two years after the effective date of the certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the regulatory agency with jurisdiction over the project; or

five years after the close of the first binding open season of the project.

If the licensee fails to sanction the project as required under this section, the licensee shall, upon request by the state,

seek approval from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, as applicable, to abandon and transfer the certificate to the state or the state’s designee; and

assign to the state or the state’s designee all engineering designs, contracts, permits, and other data related to the project that are acquired by the licensee during the term of the license before the date of the abandonment or transfer.

The transfer and assignments under (d) of this section as a result of failure to comply with (a) or (b) of this section are at no cost to the state or the state’s designee. A transfer under (c) of this section shall be subject to the state’s payment to the licensee of the net amount of expenditures incurred and paid by the licensee that are qualified expenditures for the purposes of AS

43.90.110

.

In this section, “effective date of the certificate of public convenience and necessity” means the earlier of the date the order granting the certificate is no longer subject to judicial review, or the date the licensee accepts the certificate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.210.
Amendment of or modification to the project plan.

Subject to the approval of the commissioners, a licensee may amend or modify its project plan if the amendment or modification improves the net present value of the project to the state, is necessary because of an order or requirement by a regulatory agency with jurisdiction over the project or by the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, or is necessary because of changed circumstances outside the licensee’s control and not reasonably foreseeable before the license was issued. An amendment or modification approved under this section must be consistent with the requirements of AS

43.90.130

and, except for an amendment or modification required because of an order or requirement of a regulatory agency with jurisdiction over the project or by the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, may not substantially diminish the value of the project to the state or the project’s likelihood of success.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.220.
Records, reports, conditions, and audit requirements.

A licensee shall maintain complete and accurate records of all expenditures and commitments of state money received under this chapter, including receipts and records showing the payment or cost of purchased items and services, the names and addresses of the sellers and service providers, and the dates of service or delivery.

Upon reasonable notice, the commissioners may audit the records, books, and files of the entity receiving the state money or making the expenditures and commitments of money received from the state under this chapter.

The commissioners may do the following with respect to information relating to the project: conduct hearings or other investigative inquiries; compel the attendance of witnesses and production of documents; and require the licensee to furnish information in paper copy or electronic format.

After a license has been issued and until commencement of commercial operations of a natural gas pipeline, the licensee shall allow the commissioners to

have a representative present at all meetings of the licensee’s governing body or bodies and equity holders that relate to the project;

receive all relevant notices and information when and as sent to the governing body or bodies and equity holders;

enjoy the same access to information about the licensee as the governing body members and equity owners receive; and

receive relevant reports or information from the licensee that the commissioners reasonably request.

All proprietary information, privileged information, and trade secrets received by the commissioners or their representative under (d) of this section are not subject to public disclosure under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

.

A licensee shall maintain the records and reports required under this section for seven years from the date the licensee receives state money under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007; am § 34 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska gasline inducement act reimbursement, see 15 AAC 90, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (e), substituted “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

” for “AS 40.25”.

Sec. 43.90.230.
License violations; damages.

A licensee is in violation of the license if the commissioners determine that the licensee has

requested and received money from the state under this chapter for an expenditure that is not a qualified expenditure under AS

43.90.110

;

except as required to conform with a requirement of a regulatory agency with jurisdiction over the project, substantially departed from the specifications set out in the application without state approval of a project plan amendment or modification under AS

43.90.210

;

violated any provision of this chapter or any other provision of state or federal law material to the license;

failed to accept a certificate as required under AS

43.90.200(a)

or failed to sanction the project as required under AS

43.90.200(b)

; or

otherwise violated a material term of the license.

The commissioners shall provide written notice to the licensee identifying a license violation. The commissioners and the licensee have 90 days after the date the notice is issued to resolve the violation informally.

The commissioners may suspend disbursement of state reimbursements to the licensee beginning on the date that the notice of violation issued under (b) of this section is sent to the licensee. The commissioners may resume disbursement on the date that the commissioners determine that the violation is cured.

If the commissioners and the licensee are unable to resolve the violation within the period described in (b) of this section, the commissioners shall notify the licensee that the violation has not been cured and provide the licensee with an opportunity to be heard. If, after notice and hearing, the commissioners determine that the violation has not been cured, the commissioners shall issue a written decision that is a final administrative action for purposes of appeal to the superior court in the state.

If the determination issued under (d) of this section finds an unresolved violation, the commissioners may impose one or more of the following remedies:

discontinuation of state reimbursements under this chapter;

recoupment of state money that the licensee has received under this chapter to date, with interest, regardless of whether the licensee has expended or committed that money;

license revocation;

assignment to the state or the state’s designee of all engineering designs, contracts, permits, and other data related to the project that are acquired by the licensee during the term of the license; and

any other remedies provided by law or in equity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska gasline inducement act reimbursement, see 15 AAC 90, art. 1.

Sec. 43.90.240.
Abandonment of project.

If the commissioners and the licensee agree that the project is uneconomic, the project shall be abandoned, the inducement provided for in AS

43.90.110

shall be terminated, and, except for requirements imposed on the licensee under (e) of this section and AS

43.90.220

, the state and the licensee no longer have an obligation under this chapter with respect to the license.

If the commissioners or the licensee determines that the project is uneconomic and the other party disagrees, the disagreement shall be settled by arbitration administered by the American Arbitration Association under the substantive and procedural laws of this state, and judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in superior court in the state. In the event of arbitration, each party shall select an arbitrator from the American Arbitration Association’s National Roster, and the two arbitrators shall appoint a third arbitrator from the American Arbitration Association’s National Roster who shall serve as the chair of the three-member arbitration panel. If the arbitration panel determines that the project is

uneconomic, the state and the licensee no longer have an obligation under this chapter with respect to the license, except for requirements imposed on the licensee under (e) of this section and AS

43.90.220

; or

not uneconomic, the obligations of the licensee and the state continue as provided under this chapter and the license.

The arbitration panel in (b) of this section shall make a determination that the project is uneconomic only if the panel finds that the party claiming the project is uneconomic has proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the

project does not have credit support sufficient to finance construction of the project through firm transportation commitments, government assistance, or other external sources of financing; and

predicted costs of transportation at a 100 percent load factor, when deducted from predicted gas sales revenue using publicly available predictions of future gas prices, would result in a producer rate of return that is below the rate typically accepted by a prudent oil and gas exploration and production company for incremental upstream investment that is required to produce and deliver gas to the project.

If the state makes a payment to the licensee under AS

43.90.440

, the license is considered abandoned, and the state and the licensee no longer have any obligations under this chapter with respect to the license, except that the licensee must comply with the

requirements imposed on the licensee under AS

43.90.220

regarding state money received by the licensee before the license was considered abandoned; and

requirements of AS

43.90.440

.

If the commissioners and the licensee agree that the project is uneconomic or an arbitration panel makes a final determination that the project is uneconomic, the licensee shall, upon the state’s request, transfer to the state or the state’s designee all engineering designs, contracts, permits, and other data related to the project that are acquired by the licensee during the term of the license upon reimbursement by the state of the net amount of expenditures incurred and paid by the licensee that are qualified expenditures for the purposes of AS

43.90.110

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.250.
Alaska Gasline Inducement Act coordinator.

There is created in the Office of the Governor the position of Alaska Gasline Inducement Act coordinator. Administrative support for the position shall be provided by the Office of the Governor. The position shall continue until one year after commencement of commercial operations of the project.

The governor shall appoint a person to the position of Alaska Gasline Inducement Act coordinator. The individual serving as the Alaska Gasline Inducement Act coordinator may be removed from the position at the discretion of the governor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)